Washington statutes.
RCW 4.56.200

Commencement of lien on real estate.

The lien of judgments upon the real estate of the judgment debtor shall commence as follows:

(1) Judgments of the district court of the United States rendered or filed in the county in which the real estate of the judgment debtor is situated, from the time of the entry or filing thereof;

(2) Judgments of the superior court for the county in which the real estate of the judgment debtor is situated, from the time of the filing by the county clerk upon the execution docket in accordance with RCW 4.64.030;

(3) Judgments of the district court of the United States rendered in any county in this state other than that in which the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is situated, judgments of the supreme court of this state, judgments of the court of appeals of this state, and judgments of the superior court for any county other than that in which the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is situated, from the time of the filing of a duly certified abstract of such judgment with the county clerk of the county in which the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is situated, as provided in this act;

(4) Judgments of a district court of this state rendered or filed as a foreign judgment in a superior court in the county in which the real estate of the judgment debtor is situated, from the time of the filing of a duly certified district court judgment or duly certified transcript of the docket of the district court with the county clerk of the county in which such judgment was rendered or filed, and upon such filing said judgment shall become to all intents and purposes a judgment of the superior court for said county; and

(5) Judgments of a district court of this state rendered or filed in a superior court in any other county in this state than that in which the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is situated, a transcript of the docket of which has been filed with the county clerk of the county where such judgment was rendered or filed, from the time of filing, with the county clerk of the county in which the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is situated, of a duly certified abstract of the record of said judgment in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the certified transcript of the docket of said judgment of said district court was originally filed.

[ 2019 c 251 s 8; 2012 c 133 s 1; 2002 c 261 s 3; 1987 c 202 s 117; 1971 c 81 s 17; 1929 c 60 s 2; RRS s 445-1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The words at the end of subsection (3) reading "as provided in this act" appeared in chapter 60, Laws of 1929 which is codified as RCW 4.56.090, 4.56.100, 4.56.190 through 4.56.210, 4.64.070, 4.64.090, 4.64.110, and 4.64.120.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Entry of verdict in execution docket—Effect—Cessation of lien: RCW 4.64.020, 4.64.100.